Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,115
Establishment of health maintenance organization; certificate of authority required.

Any person may apply to the director for a certificate of authority to establish and operate a health maintenance organization in compliance with the Health Maintenance Organization Act. No person shall establish or operate a health maintenance organization in this state without obtaining a certificate of authority under the act. Operating a health maintenance organization without a certificate of authority shall be a violation of the Unauthorized Insurers Act. A foreign corporation may qualify under the Health Maintenance Organization Act if it registers to do business in this state as a foreign corporation under the Business Corporation Act and complies with the Health Maintenance Organization Act and other applicable state laws.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 88;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 224.

Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.

Unauthorized Insurers Act, see section 44-2008.